src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Noun inflection for Mansi

This file contains the noun inflection. 

All Mansi nouns have the same suffixe, thus only one continuation lexica.
The stem vowel alternation is taken care of in the twolc file.

## The lexicon
* LEXICON N_VI Stems ending in и ы: а̄ви
put derivations here
* LEXICON N0_VI Stems ending in и ы: а̄ви

* LEXICON N_VO_rus100
* LEXICON N_VO_rusmns slightly Mansi-like
put derivations here
* LEXICON N0_VO Stems ending in other vowels ӯра

* ма̄ # examples:*
* *ма̄тем:* `ма̄+N+Der+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom+PxSg1`

put derivations here
* LEXICON N0_SYNCH Stems with syncopy, hard

put derivations here
* LEXICON N0_SYNCS Stems with syncopy, soft

* LEXICON N_NOSYNCH Stems without syncopy, hard

* LEXICON N_NOSYNCS Stems without syncopy, soft

* LEXICON N_VCH_rus100
put derivations here
* LEXICON N0_VCH Stems ending in single hard consonant

* LEXICON N_XUM Special stems

put derivations here
* LEXICON N0_VCCH Stems ending in hard consonant cluster: а̄вгуст

put derivations here
* LEXICON N0_VCS Stems ending in single soft consonant

* LEXICON N_VCCS_rus100
put derivations here
* LEXICON N0_VCCS Stems ending in soft consonant cluster

**LEXICON N1_** There are three Mansi noun lexicons, divided according to number Sg, Du, Pl, such that Propernouns are singular. They has entries of two types:
### 1. Non-possessive forms 
affixes for Nom, Loc, Lat, Abl, Ins, Tra.

### 2. Possessive forms
Affixes for pissessive suffixes + case forms.

### 2. Possessive forms
Affixes for pissessive suffixes + case forms.

### 2. Possessive forms
Affixes for pissessive suffixes + case forms.

### 3. Derivation forms
This points all nouns to **A_** via the *-ыӈ* syffix and to **Adv** via the *-ыщ* derivational suffix.

sg x pxsg1

sg x pxsg2

sg x pxsg3

sg x pxdu1

sg x pxdu2

sg x pxdu3

du x pxsg1

du x pxsg2

du x pxsg3

du x pxdu1

du x pxdu2

du x pxdu3

du x pxpl1

du x pxpl2

du x pxpl3

pl x pxsg1

pl x pxsg2

pl x pxsg3

pl x pxdu1

pl x pxdu2

pl x pxdu3

pl x pxpl1

pl x pxpl2

pl x pxpl3

tags-n-flags
Sg X

Du X 

Pl X 

Sg X PxSg1 has no variation

Sg X PxSg2 has no variation

Sg X PxSg3

Sg X PxPl3 has no variation

pl x pxsg1 has no variation

pl x pxsg2

pl x pxsg3

pl x pxdu1

pl x pxdu2

pl x pxdu3

pl x pxpl1 has no variation

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mns/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
